Utah statutes.
76-6-102.   Arson.

(1)  A person is guilty of arson if, under circumstances not amounting to aggravated arson, the person by means of fire or explosives unlawfully and intentionally damages:

(a)  any property with intention of defrauding an insurer; or

(b)  the property of another.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a second degree felony.

(3)  A violation of Subsection (1)(b) is:

(a)  a second degree felony if:

(i)  the damage caused is or exceeds $5,000 in value; or

(ii)  as a proximate result of the fire or explosion, any person not a participant in the offense suffers serious bodily injury as defined in Section 76-1-601;

(b)  a third degree felony if:

(i)  the damage caused is or exceeds $1,500 but is less than $5,000 in value;

(ii)  as a proximate result of the fire or explosion, any person not a participant in the offense suffers substantial bodily injury as defined in Section 76-1-601; or

(iii)  the fire or explosion endangers human life;

(c)  a class A misdemeanor if the damage caused is or exceeds $500 but is less than $1,500 in value; and

(d)  a class B misdemeanor if the damage caused is less than $500.

